Maryland, session 2026, SB0049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0049*

SENATE BILL 49
SUBTITLE 27. RIGHTS OF UNHOUSED INDIVIDUALS.
3–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ADEQUATE ALTERNATIVE INDOOR SPACE” MEANS AN INDOOR
SPACE THAT:
(I) IS LEGALLY AND PHYSICALLY ACCESSIBLE TO AN
UNHOUSED INDIVIDUAL WITHOUT REQUIRING THE INDIVIDUAL TO WAIVE ANY
CONSTITUTIONAL OR STATUTORY RIGHT PROVIDED UNDER FEDERAL, STATE, OR
LOCAL LAW AS A CONDITION OF ACCESS;
(II) IS AVAILABLE INDEFINITELY TO AN UNHOUSED INDIVIDUAL
AT NO CHARGE AND WITHOUT REQUIRING A DAILY REAPPLICATION;
(III) IS COMPLIANT WITH THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH
DISABILITIES ACT; AND
(IV) IS ABLE TO ACCOMMODATE:
1. A SPOUSE OR DOMESTIC PARTNER AND OTHER
FAMILY MEMBERS;
2. SUPPORT INDIVIDUALS; AND
3. ANY POSSESSIONS THAT AN UNHOUSED INDIVIDUAL
WISHES TO BRING TO THE SPACE.
(2) “ADEQUATE ALTERNATIVE INDOOR SPACE” DOES NOT INCLUDE
AN INDOOR SPACE LOCATED OUTSIDE THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH AN UNHOUSED
INDIVIDUAL RESIDES UNLESS TRANSPORTATION IS AVAILABLE AT NO COST TO THE
INDIVIDUAL TO ENSURE THE INDIVIDUAL IS ABLE TO ADDRESS ONGOING PERSONAL
OR PROFESSIONAL MATTERS WITHIN THE JURISDICTION.
(C) (1) “LIFE–SUSTAINING ACTIVITY” MEANS MOVING, RESTING,
SITTING, STANDING, LYING DOWN, SLEEPING, EATING, DRINKING, OR PROTECTING
ONESELF FROM THE ELEMENTS.
(2) “LIFE–SUSTAINING ACTIVITY” INCLUDES STORING PERSONAL
PROPERTY, AS NEEDED, TO SAFELY SHELTER THE PROPERTY FROM THE ELEMENTS.

SENATE BILL 49 3
(D) “MOTOR VEHICLE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–135 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(E) (1) “PUBLIC PLACE” MEANS:
(I) PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED OR LEASED, IN WHOLE OR IN
PART, BY ANY STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY;
(II) PROPERTY ON WHICH THERE IS AN EASEMENT FOR PUBLIC
USE; OR
(III) FEDERAL PROPERTY ON WHICH A LOCAL GOVERNMENT HAS
THE AUTHORITY TO ENFORCE LOCAL LAWS.
(2) “PUBLIC PLACE” INCLUDES:
(I) A PLAZA;
(II) A COURTYARD;
(III) A PARKING LOT;
(IV) A SIDEWALK;
(V) A PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION FACILITY;
(VI) A PUBLIC BUILDING;
(VII) A SHOPPING CENTER;
(VIII) AN UNDERPASS OR OTHER LAND ADJACENT TO A ROADWAY;
AND
(IX) A PARK.
(F) “RECREATIONAL VEHICLE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 15–1001 OF
THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(G) (1) “UNHOUSED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO LACKS A
FIXED, REGULAR, AND ADEQUATE NIGHTTIME RESIDENCE.
(2) “UNHOUSED INDIVIDUAL” INCLUDES AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:

SENATE BILL 49
(I) SHARES THE HOUSING OF ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL DUE TO
LOSS OF HOUSING, ECONOMIC HARDSHIP, OR SIMILAR REASON;
(II) LIVES IN A MOTEL, A HOTEL, A TRAILER PARK, OR CAMPING
GROUNDS DUE TO A LACK OF ACCESS TO AN ADEQUATE ALTERNATIVE INDOOR
SPACE;
(III) LIVES IN AN EMERGENCY OR TRANSITIONAL SHELTER;
(IV) LIVES IN A PLACE UNFIT FOR HUMAN HABITATION;
(V) LIVES IN A CAR, A PARK, AN ABANDONED BUILDING,
SUBSTANDARD HOUSING, A TRANSPORTATION STATION, OR A SIMILAR SETTING;
(VI) IS A MINOR ABANDONED IN A HOSPITAL; OR
(VII) IS A MINOR AWAITING A FOSTER CARE PLACEMENT.
3–2702.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THREATENING OR
IMPOSING CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PUNISHMENTS ON UNHOUSED INDIVIDUALS FOR
UNDERTAKING LIFE–SUSTAINING ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING SLEEPING OR TAKING
SHELTER IN AN UNOBTRUSIVE MANNER ON PUBLIC LAND IN THE ABSENCE OF
ADEQUATE ALTERNATIVE INDOOR SPACES, VIOLATES UNHOUSED INDIVIDUALS’
RIGHT TO BE FREE FROM CRUEL AND UNUSUAL PUNISHMENT AND EXCESSIVE FINES
GUARANTEED BY ARTICLE 25 OF THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE COURTS
SHALL LIBERALLY CONSTRUE THIS SUBTITLE TO MAXIMIZE THE PROTECTIONS
AFFORDED BY IT TO UNHOUSED INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE.
3–2703.
(A) ALL UNHOUSED INDIVIDUALS HAVE THE RIGHT TO:
(1) BE ON OR ABOUT PUBLIC PLACES WITHIN THE STATE WITHOUT
BEING DISCRIMINATED AGAINST ON THE BASIS OF ACTUAL OR PERCEIVED HOUSING
STATUS;
(2) ENGAGE IN LIFE–SUSTAINING ACTIVITIES ON OR ABOUT PUBLIC
PLACES, PROVIDED THAT SUCH ACTIVITIES DO NOT:

SENATE BILL 49 5
(I) HINDER OR OBSTRUCT THE ORDINARY COURSE OF A
PRIVATE OR PUBLIC ENTITY; OR
(II) OBSTRUCT THE NORMAL MOVEMENT OF PEDESTRIAN OR
VEHICULAR TRAFFIC IN SUCH A MANNER THAT CREATES A HAZARD TO OTHERS,
UNLESS AN ADEQUATE ALTERNATIVE INDOOR SPACE IS AVAILABLE AND HAS BEEN
OFFERED TO THE INDIVIDUAL, INCLUDING TRANSPORTATION FOR THE INDIVIDUAL
AND THE INDIVIDUAL’S BELONGINGS;
(3) USE AND MOVE FREELY IN PUBLIC PLACES WITHOUT BEING
DISCRIMINATED AGAINST ON THE BASIS OF ACTUAL OR PERCEIVED HOUSING
STATUS;
(4) PRIVACY IN PERSONAL PROPERTY STORED ON OR ABOUT PUBLIC
PLACES TO THE SAME EXTENT AS PERSONAL PROPERTY STORED IN A PRIVATE
DWELLING;
(5) PRAY, MEDITATE, WORSHIP, OR PRACTICE RELIGION ON OR
ABOUT PUBLIC PLACES WITHOUT BEING DISCRIMINATED AGAINST ON THE BASIS OF
ACTUAL OR PERCEIVED HOUSING STATUS;
(6) OCCUPY A MOTOR VEHICLE OR RECREATIONAL VEHICLE PARKED
ON OR ABOUT A PUBLIC PLACE THAT IS NOT OBSTRUCTING THE NORMAL MOVEMENT
OF TRAFFIC;
(7) RELOCATE A MOTOR VEHICLE OR RECREATIONAL VEHICLE BEING
USED FOR LIFE–SUSTAINING ACTIVITIES BEFORE RECEIVING A PARKING TICKET OR
THE VEHICLE BEING TOWED;
(8) RETRIEVE ITEMS FROM A TOWED MOTOR VEHICLE OR
RECREATIONAL VEHICLE;
(9) RECLAIM A TOWED MOTOR VEHICLE OR RECREATIONAL VEHICLE
FROM STORAGE FREE OF CHARGE OR AT A REDUCED RATE ON CONSIDERATION OF
THE INDIVIDUAL’S ABILITY TO PAY ANY COSTS; AND
(10) RECEIVE ANY ADDITIONAL INTERVENTIONS OFFERED TO
UNHOUSED INDIVIDUALS BY LOCAL HUMAN SERVICES, SOCIAL SERVICES, PUBLIC
HEALTH, AND LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES WHEN ADEQUATE ALTERNATIVE
INDOOR SPACE IS NOT AVAILABLE.

SENATE BILL 49
(B) THE STATE, AN AGENCY OF THE STATE, A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF
THE STATE, OR AN OFFICIAL OR AGENT OF THE STATE, AN AGENCY OF THE STATE,
OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE ACTING UNDER COLOR OF LAW MAY
NOT:
(1) IMPOSE CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PENALTIES AGAINST AN UNHOUSED
INDIVIDUAL FOR EXERCISING A RIGHT DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION; OR
(2) IMPOSE A CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PENALTY AGAINST ANY INDIVIDUAL
FOR SOLICITING, SHARING, ACCEPTING, OR OFFERING FOOD, WATER, MONEY, OR
OTHER DONATIONS TO UNHOUSED INDIVIDUALS ON OR ABOUT PUBLIC PLACES.
(C) THE STATE, AN AGENCY OF THE STATE, A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF
THE STATE, OR AN OFFICIAL OR AGENT OF THE STATE ACTING UNDER COLOR OF
LAW MAY ARREST OR IMPOSE CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PENALTIES ON AN UNHOUSED
INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS ENGAGED IN CRIMINAL ACTIVITY THAT IS NOT A PROTECTED
ACTIVITY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
3–2704.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A PROSECUTION FOR:
(1) CRIMINAL TRESPASS UNDER § 6–402, § 6–409, OR § 6–410 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE OR A SIMILAR LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE; AND
(2) DISTURBING THE PEACE OR DISORDERLY CONDUCT UNDER §
10–201 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE OR ANY SIMILAR LOCAL LAW OR
ORDINANCE.
(B) IN A PROSECUTION FOR AN OFFENSE LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, A DEFENDANT MAY ASSERT AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE OF NECESSITY IF:
(1) THE DEFENDANT COMMITTED THE ALLEGED CRIMINAL ACT
WHILE ENGAGING IN A LIFE–SUSTAINING ACTIVITY; AND
(2) THE DEFENDANT, AT THE TIME OF COMMITTING THE CRIMINAL
ACT, WAS NOT OFFERED ACCESS TO AN ADEQUATE ALTERNATIVE INDOOR SPACE
AND A REASONABLE STORAGE OPTION FOR PERSONAL PROPERTY.
(C) A DEFENSE OF NECESSITY RAISED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION CREATES A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT AN ADEQUATE
ALTERNATIVE INDOOR SPACE WAS NOT AVAILABLE TO THE DEFENDANT.

SENATE BILL 49 7
3–2705.
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL SUPERSEDE ANY LOCAL LAW OR
ORDINANCE COMPARABLE IN SUBJECT MATTER EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THAT THE
LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE PROVIDES BROADER APPLICABILITY OR MORE
PROTECTIONS FOR UNHOUSED INDIVIDUALS THAN THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – Local Government
5–207.
(a) A municipality may establish and maintain:
(1) a fire department; and
(2) a police force.
(b) A municipality may:
(1) provide for the removal of fire hazards;
(2) control the use and handling of dangerous and explosive materials; and
(3) prevent the discharge of firearms or other explosive instruments.
(c) A municipality may:
(1) pay rewards for information relating to crime committed in the
municipality;
(2) prohibit [vagrancy,] vice, gambling, and houses of prostitution in the
municipality;
(3) enforce all ordinances relating to disorderly conduct and nuisances
equally:
(i) within the municipality; and
(ii) up to one–half mile outside the municipal limits, except where
there is a conflict with the powers of another municipality; and
(4) prohibit minors from being on the streets and in public places at certain
hours of the night.

SENATE BILL 49
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.